New York, session 2025-2026, A8842.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subdivision (d) of section 1111-c-1 of the 2 vehicle and traffic law, as added by section 1 of part MM of chapter 56 3 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 3. "bus operation-related traffic regulations" shall mean the follow- 5 ing provisions set forth in chapter four of title thirty-four of the 6 rules of the city of New York, adopted pursuant to section sixteen 7 hundred forty-two of this chapter: 4-08(c)(3), violation of posted no 8 standing rules prohibited-bus stop, excluding such violations occurring 9 on a roadway in a cooperative housing development containing Mitchell- 10 Lama housing with no fewer than ten thousand units; 4-08(e)(9), general 11 no stopping zones-bicycle lanes; 4-08(f)(1), general no standing zones- 12 double parking; and 4-08(f)(4), general no standing zones-bus lane. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to section 15 1111-c-1 of the vehicle and traffic law made by section one of this act 16 shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed 17 therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11626-02-5